Illinois, session 104th, HB1862.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Human Services Act is amended 5by changing Section 1-85 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 1305/1-85)7    Sec. 1-85. Home Illinois Program. 8    (a) Subject to appropriation, the Department of Human 9Services shall establish the Home Illinois Program. The Home 10Illinois Program shall focus on preventing and ending 11homelessness in Illinois and may include, but not be limited 12to, homeless prevention, emergency and transitional housing, 13rapid rehousing, outreach, capital investment, and related 14services and supports for individuals at risk or experiencing 15homelessness. The Department may establish program eligibility 16criteria and other program requirements by rule. The 17Department of Human Services may consult with the Capital 18Development Board, the Department of Commerce and Economic 19Opportunity, and the Illinois Housing Development Authority in 20the management and disbursement of funds for capital related 21projects. The Capital Development Board, the Department of 22Commerce and Economic Opportunity, and the Illinois Housing 23Development Authority shall act in a consulting role only for   HB1862 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 10616 KTG 20692 b1the evaluation of applicants, scoring of applicants, or 2administration of the grant program.3    (b) Unless otherwise required by State law or federal 4requirements, a service provider shall not be subject to a 5matching funds requirement in order to be eligible to receive 6funds from the Department for the Emergency and Transitional 7Housing Program or the Supportive Housing Program. When making 8funding determinations, the Department retains discretion to 9take into consideration the ability of a service provider to 10leverage other funding sources, as well as other factors that 11may demonstrate fiscal solvency of the service provider and 12that the service provider is not solely reliant on State funds 13for the provision of services. 14(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 6-7-23.) 15    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 16becoming law.